lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų įrangos priedai: Kamanų priedai; Arklio pentinai; Žirgų įrangos dėžės; Balnų priedai; Pentinų dirželiai; Kilpų priedai; Pakinktų ir kamanų laikikliai
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马具配件: 水勒配件; 马用马刺; 马钉盒; 马鞍配件; 马刺带; 马镫配件; 马具和水勒挂架
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Tillbehör till hästutrustning: Tränstillbehör; Sporrar; Lådor för hästutrustning; Sadeltillbehör; Sporremmar; Stigbygeltillbehör; Hängare för sadlar och träns
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Accesorios para riendas de caballos: Accesorios para bridas; Espuelas para caballos; Cajas para riendas de caballos; Accesorios para sillas de montar; Correas para espuelas; Accesorios para estribos; Soportes para arreos y bridas
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Аксессуары для сбруи: Аксессуары для уздечек; Шпоры для верховой езды; Ящики для сбруи; Аксессуары для седел; Ремни для шпор; Аксессуары для стремян; Кронштейны для седел и уздечек
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevosen lisätarvikkeet: Suitsien tarvikkeet; Kannukset; Hevostarvikelaatikot; Satulatarvikkeet; Kannusremmit; Jalustintarvikkeet; Satula- ja suitsitelineet
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Αξεσουάρ εξοπλισμού αλόγου: Αξεσουάρ χαλινού; Σπιρούνια ιππασίας; Κουτιά εξοπλισμού αλόγου; Αξεσουάρ σέλας; Λουριά για σπιρούνια; Αξεσουάρ αναβολέα; Βάσεις εξοπλισμού & χαλινών ιππασίας
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lófelszerelés-kiegészítők: Kantárkiegészítők; Lovas sarkantyúk; Lófelszerelés-dobozok; Nyeregkiegészítők; Sarkantyúszíjak; Kengyelkiegészítők; Nyereg- és kantártartók
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Pribor za opremu za konje: Dodaci za uzde; Mamuze za konja; Kutije za opremu za konje; Pribor za sedlo; Remenje za mamuze; Dodaci za stremen; Stalci za opremu i uzde za konja
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬具関連用品: 頭絡用アクセサリー; 馬用拍車; 馬具収納庫; 鞍関連用品; 拍車革; あぶみ用アクセサリー; 馬具・頭絡ラック
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Equipamento para montaria: Acessórios para cabeçada; Esporas; Caixas de equipamento para montaria; Acessórios para selas; Correias para esporas; Acessórios para estribos; Suportes para arreios e cabeçadas
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Tilbehør til hesteutstyr: Tilbehør til hodelag; Sporer for hest; Hesteutstyrsbokser; Saltilbehør; Sporestropper; Tilbehør til stigbøyler; Sal- og hodelagsholdere
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Tilbehør til rideudstyr: Tilbehør til trenser; Sporer til ridning; Opbevaring af rideudstyr; Sadeltilbehør; Sporeremme; Tilbehør til stigbøjler; Ophæng til sadler og trenser
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > อุปกรณ์ขี่ม้า: อุปกรณ์เสริมบังเหียน; เดือยแทงม้า; กล่องอุปกรณ์ของม้า; อุปกรณ์อานม้า; สายรัดเดือยแทงม้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมโกลน; ชั้นวางอุปกรณ์ขี่ม้าและบังเหียน
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 마구 부대용품: 굴레 액세서리; 말 박차; 마구 상자; 안장 부대용품; 박차 스트랩; 등자 액세서리; 마구 및 굴레 랙
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Akcesoria do uprzęży jeździeckich: Akcesoria do ogłowi; Ostrogi dla koni; Skrzynki na przybory jeździeckie; Osprzęt do siodeł; Paski do ostróg; Akcesoria do strzemion; Wieszaki na sprzęt jeździecki i ogłowia
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Tack Accessories: Bridle Accessories; Horse Spurs; Horse Tack Boxes; Saddle Accessories; Spur Straps; Stirrup Accessories; Tack & Bridle Racks
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Аксесоари за конски сбруи: Аксесоари за юзда; Конски шпори; Кутии за конски сбруи; Аксесоари за седла; Каишки за шпори; Аксесоари за стремена; Стойки за седла и юзди
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Dodatki za konjsko opremo: Dodatki za uzde; Konjske ostroge; Škatle za konjsko opremo; Dodatki za sedla; Jermeni za otroke; Dodatki za stremena; Stojala za opremo in uzde
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Accesorii harnașamente pentru cai: Accesorii pentru zăbale și căpăstru; Pinteni pentru cai; Cutii harnașament pentru cai; Accesorii șei; Curele pentru pinteni; Accesorii pentru scări de șa; Suporturi pentru ham și zăbale
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬具配件: 水勒配件; 馬刺; 馬具收納盒; 馬鞍配件; 馬刺帶; 馬鐙配件; 馬具與水勒架
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Acessórios de equipamento para cavalos: Acessórios de cabeçada; Esporas; Caixas de equipamento para cavalos; Acessórios para selas; Correias de espora; Acessórios de estribo; Suportes para arreios e cabeçadas
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Příslušenství pro koně: Příslušenství k uzdečkám; Jezdecké ostruhy; Boxy na výstroj pro koně; Příslušenství k sedlům; Řemínky k ostruhám; Příslušenství ke třmenům; Držáky na sedla a uzdečky
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Zubehör für Sattel & Zaumzeug: Trensenzubehör; Pferdesporen; Sattel- & Zaumzeugbehälter; Sattelzubehör; Sporenriemen; Steigbügelzubehör; Sattel- & Trensenhalter
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Eyer Takımı Aksesuarları: Başlık aksesuarları; At mahmuzları; At Koşum Takımı Kutuları; Eyer Aksesuarları; Mahmuz kayışları; Üzengi aksesuarları; Eyer ve başlık askıları
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Accessoires voor paardentuig: Hoofdstelaccessoires; Paardensporen; Kisten voor paardentuig; Zadelaccessoires; Spoorriempjes; Stijgbeugelaccessoires; Tuig- en hoofdstelrekken
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Príslušenstvo pre jazdecké potreby: Príslušenstvo pre zubadlá; Konské ostrohy; Krabice pre jazdecké potreby; Príslušenstvo pre sedlá; Popruhy na ostrohy; Príslušenstvo k strmeňom; Vešiaky na sedlové a uzdové príslušenstvo
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Accessori per finimenti per cavalli: Accessori per briglie; Speroni; Scatole per finimenti per cavalli; Accessori per selle; Cinturini per speroni; Accessori per staffe; Portaselle e portabriglie
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Phụ kiện bộ yên cương ngựa: Phụ kiện dây cương; Cựa cưỡi ngựa; Hộp yên ngựa; Phụ kiện yên ngựa; Dây đeo cựa; Phụ kiện bàn đạp; Giá treo dây cương & đồ yên ngựa
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Accessoires de harnachement pour chevaux: Accessoires de bride; Éperons pour cheval; Coffres d'écurie; Accessoires de selles; Courroies d’éperons; Accessoires d’étrier; Porte-selles et porte-licols